Hawaii statutes.
§206E-121 Loans; sale, pledge, or
assignment. (a) Subject to any agreement with the holders of its revenue
bonds, the authority may sell its loans at public or private sale at a price
and upon terms and conditions as it determines.

(b) Subject to any agreement with the holders
of its revenue bonds, the authority may pledge or assign its loans, other
agreements, notes, or property to secure the loans or agreements. [L 1982, c
228, pt of §8]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next